04_Morphology/esp.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<sg%>      ! singular marker
%<pl%>      ! plural marker
%{s%}       ! plural

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N
%<sg%>: # ;
%<pl%>:%>%{s%} # ;

LEXICON Nouns

actriz N ;
árbol N ;
cantimplora N ;
casa N ;
corazón N ;
desoxirribonucleico N ;
electrodoméstico N ;
electroencefalografista N ;
espíritu N ;
hipotálamo N ;
interculturalidad N ;
internacionalización N ;
modongo N ;
pantufla N ;
persona N ;
lápiz N ;
ley N ;
mamut N ;
retroalimentación N ;
taxi N ;
